Hawaii statutes.
§171-44 Lease for recreation-residence use.
[(a)] Notwithstanding any limitations to the contrary, the board of land and
natural resources may lease, by direct negotiation and without recourse to
public auction, lands within a state park or forest reserve and other lands set
aside under executive orders, for recreation-residence use for a period not to
exceed twenty years on such terms and conditions as may be prescribed by the
board.

{(b)] The [board] of land and natural
resources shall enforce all provisions of recreation-residential use lease
agreements and shall establish a schedule of penalties and fines for any breach
of the provisions of a recreation-residential use lease agreement unless
penalties and fines are specified in the lease agreement. [L 1965, c 239, §38;
Supp, §103A-42.8; HRS §171-44; am L 2008, c 223, §4]

Revision Note

Subsection (b) is codified to this section pursuant to
§23G-15.

Cross References

Koke‘e state park advisory council, see §171-8.5.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next